Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2506
Administrative costs; limitation; payment.

Administrative costs incurred in implementing the Plastic Container Coding Act shall not exceed five thousand dollars and shall be paid solely from the Integrated Solid Waste Management Cash Fund.

Laws 1993, LB 63, § 6.